Utah statutes.
59-10-104.1.   Exemption from taxation.

(1)  For purposes of this section:

(a)  "Personal exemptions" means the total exemption amount an individual is allowed to claim for the taxable year under Section 151, Internal Revenue Code, for:

(i)  the individual;

(ii)  the individual's spouse; and

(iii)  the individual's dependents.

(b)  "Standard deduction":

(i) means the standard deduction an individual is allowed to claim for the taxable year under Section 63, Internal Revenue Code; and

(ii)  notwithstanding Subsection (1)(b)(i), does not include an additional amount allowed under Section 63(f), Internal Revenue Code, for an individual or an individual's spouse who is:

(A)  blind; or

(B)  65 years of age or older.

(2)  For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002, an individual is exempt from a tax imposed by Section 59-10-104 or 59-10-116 if the individual's adjusted gross income on the individual's federal individual income tax return for the taxable year is less than or equal to the sum of the individual's:

(a)  personal exemptions for that taxable year; and

(b)  standard deduction for that taxable year.

